Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB83.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1.1(a)(2), (4), (5) and (7) and 5 of the act of February 13, 1970 (P.L.19, No.10), entitled "An act enabling certain minors to consent to medical, dental and health services, declaring consent unnecessary under certain circumstances," are amended to read:Section 1.1. Mental Health Treatment.--(a) The following shall apply to consent for voluntary inpatient and outpatient mental health treatment:* * *(2) A minor who is [fourteen] sixteen years of age or older may consent on the minor's own behalf to voluntary inpatient 12345678910111213141516171819 mental health treatment as provided under Article II of the "Mental Health Procedures Act" or outpatient mental health treatment, and the minor's parent's or legal guardian's consent shall not be necessary.* * *(4) A parent or legal guardian who has provided consent to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment under paragraph (1) may revoke that consent, which revocation shall be effective unless the minor who is [fourteen] sixteen to eighteen years of age has provided consent for continued voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment.(5) A minor who is [fourteen] sixteen to eighteen years of age who has provided consent to voluntary inpatient or outpatient mental health treatment may revoke that consent, which revocation shall be effective unless the parent or legal guardian to the minor has provided for continued treatment under paragraph (1).* * *(7) When a petition is filed on behalf of a minor [fourteen] sixteen years of age or older and under eighteen years of age who has been confined for inpatient treatment on the consent of a parent or legal guardian and who objects to continued inpatient treatment by requesting a withdrawal from or modification of treatment, the court shall promptly appoint an attorney for the minor and schedule a hearing to be held within seventy-two hours following the filing of the petition, unless continued upon the request of the attorney for the minor, by a judge or mental health review officer who shall determine whether or not the voluntary mental health treatment is in the best interest of the minor. For inpatient treatment to continue 20250HB0083PN0067 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against the minor's wishes, the court must find all of the following by clear and convincing evidence:(i) that the minor has a diagnosed mental disorder;(ii) that the disorder is treatable;(iii) that the disorder can be treated in the particular facility where the treatment is taking place; and(iv) that the proposed inpatient treatment setting represents the least restrictive alternative that is medically appropriate.* * *Section 5. Liability for Rendering Services.--[The] (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), the consent of a minor who professes to be, but is not a minor whose consent alone is effective to medical, dental and health services shall be deemed effective without the consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian, if the physician or other person relied in good faith upon the representations of the minor.(b) If a physician or other person renders medical, dental or health services or mental health treatment to a minor under this act and the minor does not obtain the consent of a parent or legal guardian, the physician or other person shall be liable for the decisions of the minor.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6. Applicability.--(a) This act shall not apply to a minor who has special needs. (b) As used in this section, the term "special needs" means significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning that is accompanied by significant limitations in adaptive functioning in at least two of the following skill areas: communication, self-care, home living, social and interpersonal 20250HB0083PN0067 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 skills, use of community resources, self-direction, functional academic skills, work, health and safety. The onset must occur before the individual's twenty-second birthday.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0083PN0067 - 4 - 1234